Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 8
ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTIES

44-32-801. Criminal and civil penalties.

Except as provided in section 44-32-601, any person who commits any of the acts enumerated in section 44-32-507 (1), other than those that also constitute crimes under the "Colorado Criminal Code", title 18, commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501.

Any person who violates any rule of the commission promulgated under the authority granted in this article 32, other than those that also constitute crimes under the "Colorado Criminal Code", title 18, commits a civil infraction.

The penalties set forth in this section are cumulative and do not preclude the imposition of civil or administrative penalties, sanctions, actions against licenses or registrations, or any other penalties otherwise authorized.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 320, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3331, § 799, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-60-801 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-32-802. Cancellation of license.

In case of a willful violation of this article 32 by a person holding a license, the commission, upon conviction of the offender, may cancel the offender's license, and the cancellation shall operate as a forfeiture of all rights and privileges granted by the commission and of all sums of money paid to the department through the division by the offender, and the action of the commission in this respect shall be final.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 320, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-60-802 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-32-803. Exclusion from licensed premises.

The commission or the division may exclude from any and all licensed premises any person who has been convicted of a felony under the laws of this or any other state or of the United States, subject to the provisions of section 24-5-101. Any person so excluded by the commission or the division has a right to a hearing before the commission as to the basis of the exclusion, subject to the provisions of section 24-4-104. No such person shall enter or remain upon premises owned by any licensee conducting a race meet or operating a simulcast facility under the jurisdiction of the commission, and all such persons, upon discovery or recognition, shall be forthwith excluded or ejected from the premises. Any person so ejected or excluded from the premises of any licensee shall be denied admission to its premises and the premises of all other licensees of the commission until permission for entering has thereafter been obtained from the commission. The commission may also exclude any person from the licensed premises who willfully violates any of the provisions of this article 32 or any rule issued by the commission.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 320, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-60-803 as it existed prior to 2018.